Hawaii, session 2025, SB1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Hawaii community development authority is tasked with promoting and coordinating public and private sector community development and to plan for the development of underutilized areas of the State.  The purpose of this Act is to include the chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission or the chairperson's designee in the membership of the Hawaii community development authority. SECTION 2.  Section 206E-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The authority shall consist of the director of finance or the director's designee; the director of transportation or the director's designee; the director of business, economic development, and tourism or the director's designee; the chairperson of the board of land and natural resources[;] or the chairperson's designee; the chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission or the chairperson's designee; the director of planning or planning and permitting of each county in which a community development district is located or the director's designee; a cultural specialist; an at-large member nominated by the president of the senate; an at-large member nominated by the speaker of the house of representatives; two representatives of the Heeia community development district, comprising one resident of that district or the Koolaupoko district, which consists of sections 1 through 9 of zone 4 of the first tax map key division, and one owner of a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit organization in the Heeia community development district or Koolaupoko district; two representatives of the Kalaeloa community development district, comprising one resident of the Ewa zone (zone 9, sections 1 through 2) or the Waianae zone (zone 8, sections 1 through 9) of the first tax map key division, and one owner of a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit organization in the Ewa or Waianae zone; two representatives of the Kakaako community development district, comprising one resident of the district and one owner of a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit organization in the district; and two representatives of the Pulehunui community development district, consisting of one resident of the island of Maui, and one owner of a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit organization on the island of Maui. All members except the director of finance, director of transportation, county directors of planning or planning and permitting, director of business, economic development, and tourism, chairperson of the board of land and natural resources, chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or their respective designees shall be appointed by the governor pursuant to section 26-34.  The two at-large members nominated by the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives shall each be invited to serve and appointed by the governor from a list of three nominees submitted for each position by the nominating authority specified in this subsection. The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each submit a list of six nominees for each district to the governor to fill the two district representative positions for each community development district.  For each community development district, the governor shall appoint one member from a list of nominees submitted by the president of the senate and one member from a list of nominees submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives, and of the two appointees, one shall meet the district residency requirement and one shall meet the district small business owner or nonprofit organization officer or director requirement. The authority shall be organized and shall exercise jurisdiction as follows: (1)  For matters affecting the Heeia community development district, the following members shall be considered in determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote: (A)  The director of finance or the director's designee; (B)  The director of transportation or the director's designee; (C)  The director of business, economic development, and tourism or the director's designee; (D)  The director of planning and permitting for the county in which the Heeia community development district is located or the director's designee; (E)  The cultural specialist; (F)  The two at-large members; and (G)  The two representatives of the Heeia community development district; (2)  For matters affecting the Kalaeloa community development district, the following members shall be considered in determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote: (A)  The director of finance or the director's designee; (B)  The director of transportation or the director's designee; (C)  The director of business, economic development, and tourism or the director's designee; (D)  The director of planning and permitting for the county in which the Kalaeloa community development district is located or the director's designee; (E)  The chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission or the chairperson's designee; [(E)] (F) The cultural specialist; [(F)] (G) The two at-large members; and [(G)] (H) The two representatives of the Kalaeloa community development district; (3)  For matters affecting the Kakaako community development district, the following members shall be considered in determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote: (A)  The director of finance or the director's designee; (B)  The director of transportation or the director's designee; (C)  The director of business, economic development, and tourism or the director's designee; (D)  The director of planning and permitting for the county in which the Kakaako community development district is located or the director's designee; (E)  The chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission or the chairperson's designee; [(E)] (F)  The cultural specialist; [(F)] (G)  The two at-large members; and [(G)] (H) The two representatives of the Kakaako community development district; and (4)  For matters affecting the Pulehunui community development district, the following members shall be considered in determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote: (A)  The director of finance or the director's designee; (B)  The director of transportation or the director's designee; (C)  The director of business, economic development, and tourism or the director's designee; (D)  The director of planning for the county in which the Pulehunui community development district is located or the director's designee; (E)  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources or the chairperson's designee; (F)  The cultural specialist; (G)  The two at-large members; and (H)  The two representatives of the Pulehunui community development district. In the event of a vacancy, a member shall be appointed to fill the vacancy in the same manner as the original appointment within thirty days of the vacancy or within ten days of the senate's rejection of a previous appointment, as applicable. The terms of the director of finance; director of transportation; county directors of planning or planning and permitting; director of business, economic development, and tourism; [and] chairperson of the board of land and natural resources; and chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission; or their respective designees shall run concurrently with each official's term of office.  The terms of the appointed voting members shall be for four years, commencing on July 1 and expiring on June 30.  The governor shall provide for staggered terms of the initially appointed voting members so that the initial terms of four members selected by lot shall be for two years, the initial terms of four members selected by lot shall be for three years, and the initial terms of the remaining three members shall be for four years. The governor may remove or suspend for cause any member after due notice and public hearing. Notwithstanding section 92-15, a majority of all eligible voting members as specified in this subsection shall constitute a quorum to do business, and the concurrence of a majority of all eligible voting members as specified in this subsection shall be necessary to make any action of the authority valid.  All members shall continue in office until their respective successors have been appointed and qualified.  Except as herein provided, no member appointed under this subsection shall be an officer or employee of the State or its political subdivisions. For purposes of this section, "small business" means a business that is independently owned and that is not dominant in its field of operation." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________